Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; NATURAL RESOURCES RESEARCH INSTITUTE.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, paragraph (j), $750,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the renewable development account in the special revenue fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the Natural Resources Research Institute to study new feedstock resources for a globally competitive, next generation iron ore industry. new text end new text begin (b) The study must include but is not limited to quantification and characterization of resources related to iron ore, energy, water, hydrogen, biomass, carbon materials, process technologies, transportation, and manufacturing infrastructure that would also support cross-coupling of iron production with industries such as liquid fuels and ammonia. new text end new text begin (c) The Natural Resources Research Institute must submit the results of the study and an interim report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over energy policy and finance by May 15, 2027, and a final report by May 15, 2028. new text end